District of Columbia statutes.
23-102

Abandonment of prosecution; enlargement of time for taking action.

If any person charged with a criminal offense shall have been committed or held to bail to await the action of the grand jury and within nine months thereafter the grand jury shall not have taken action on the case, either by ignoring the charge or by returning an indictment, the prosecution of such charge shall be deemed to have been abandoned and the accused shall be set free or his bail discharged, as the case may be: but, the court having jurisdiction to try the offense for which the person has been committed, when practicable and upon good cause shown in writing and upon due notice to the accused, may from time to time enlarge the time for the taking action in such case by the grand jury.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 605, Pub. L. 91-358, title II, § 210(a)
1981 Ed., § 23-102.
1973 Ed., § 23-102.